Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 8.1. Live In Our Community Police Housing Program.

§§ 36-140.1,
36-140.2.

Expired.

Cross references.

As to assistance by the Department of Criminal Justice Services with administration of the Live In Our Community Police Housing Program and Fund, see §

9.1-102

.

Editor’s note.

This chapter, former §§

36-140.1

and 36-140.2, was enacted by Acts 2000, c. 561, and expired July 1, 2005, pursuant to Acts 2000, c. 561, cl. 2.